Hawaii statutes.
[§103D-403] Exempted items.
Specifications for goods, services, or construction items procured under
section 103D-209, or those exempted pursuant to section 103D-210, may be
prepared by a purchasing agency in accordance with this chapter and rules adopted
hereunder. [L Sp 1993, c 8, pt of §2]

Cross References

Section 103D-210, referred to in text, is repealed. For
similar provisions, see §103D-102(b)(4).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next